en: Baby & Toddler Tops
xx: Baby & Toddler Tops
cs: Dětské a kojenecké topy
da: Overdele til babyer og småbørn
de: Oberteile für Babys & Kleinkinder
es: Camisetas para bebés y niños pequeños
fr: Hauts pour bébés et tout-petits
it: Maglie per bebè e bimbi
ja: ベビー用トップス
nl: Baby- en peutertruitjes
no: Topper for baby og småbarn
pl: Topy dla dzieci i niemowląt
pt: Blusas infantis
ru: Детские топы
sv: Överdelar för bebisar och småbarn
tr: Bebek ve Küçük Çocuk Tişörtleri

en: Baby One-Pieces
xx: Baby One-Pieces
cs: Dětské dupačky
da: Babybodyer
de: Baby-Bodys
es: Bodys para bebés
fr: Bodies bébés
it: Body per bimbi
ja: ベビー用ロンパース・カバーオール
nl: Rompertjes
no: Sparkebukser
pl: Pajacyki i body dla niemowląt
pt: Macacões para bebês
ru: Детские песочники
sv: Bebisoveraller
tr: Bebek Badileri

en: Toddler Underwear
xx: Toddler Underwear
cs: Prádlo pro batolata
da: Undertøj til småbørn
de: Kleinkindunterwäsche
es: Ropa interior para niños pequeños
fr: Sous-vêtements pour tout-petits
it: Biancheria intima per bimbi
ja: 幼児用下着
nl: Peuterondergoed
no: Undertøy for småbarn
pl: Bielizna dziecięca
pt: Roupas íntimas de crianças
ru: Детское нижнее белье
sv: Småbarnsunderkläder
tr: Küçük Çocuk İç Çamaşırları

en: Dresses
xx: Dresses
cs: Šaty
da: Kjoler
de: Kleider
es: Vestidos
fr: Robes, Robe
it: Abiti
ja: ワンピース・ドレス
nl: Jurken
no: Kjoler
pl: Sukienki
pt: Vestidos
ru: Платья
sv: Klänningar
tr: Elbiseler

en: Polyester dress
fr: Robe en polyester

en: Cotton dress
fr: Robe en coton

en: One-Pieces
xx: One-Pieces
cs: Oblečení vcelku
da: Heldragter
de: Einteiler
es: Ropa de una pieza
fr: Ensembles une pièce
it: Monopezzi
ja: オールインワン・レオタード
nl: Eendelige kledingstukken
no: Heldekkende
pl: Stroje jednoczęściowe
pt: Peças únicas
ru: Одежда из цельного куска ткани
sv: Onepiecekläder
tr: Tek Parça Kıyafetler

en: Jumpsuits & Rompers
xx: Jumpsuits & Rompers
cs: Kombinézy
da: Jumpsuits og kravledragter
de: Overalls
es: Monos de pantalón corto y largo
fr: Combinaisons pantalon et combishorts
it: Tute e tutine
ja: オールインワン・コンビネゾン
nl: Jumpsuits en rompertjes
no: Babybody og lekedrakter
pl: Kombinezony jednoczęściowe
pt: Macacões e macaquinhos
ru: Комбинезоны и ромперы
sv: Jumpsuiter och sparkdräkter
tr: Tulumlar ve Çocuk Tulumları

en: Leotards & Unitards
xx: Leotards & Unitards
cs: Trikoty a celotrikoty
da: Trikoter og tætsiddende heldragter
de: Turn- & Gymnastikanzüge
es: Leotardos y unitardos
fr: Justaucorps et académiques
it: Body e body con calzamaglia
ja: レオタード・ユニタード
nl: Leggings en unitards
no: Trikoter og heltrikoter
pl: Trykoty i długie kombinezony
pt: Colants
ru: Леотарды и юнитарды
sv: Gympingdräkter och unitarder
tr: Streç Giysiler

en: Overalls
xx: Overalls
cs: Overaly
da: Overalls
de: Latzhosen
es: Pantalones de peto
fr: Salopettes
it: Salopette
ja: オーバーオール・サロペット
nl: Overalls
no: Overaller
pl: Ogrodniczki
pt: Macacões overall
ru: Комбинезоны с длинными рукавами
sv: Overaller
tr: İşçi Tulumları

en: Outerwear
xx: Outerwear
cs: Svrchní oblečení
da: Overtøj
de: Überbekleidung
es: Ropa de abrigo
fr: Vêtements de plein air
it: Abbigliamento per esterno
ja: アウター
nl: Buitenkleding
no: Yttertøy
pl: Odzież wierzchnia
pt: Casacos
ru: Верхняя одежда
sv: Ytterkläder
tr: Dış Giyim

en: Chaps
xx: Chaps
cs: Kožené chrániče
da: Overtræksbukser
de: Chaps
es: Cazadoras
fr: Chaps
it: Calzoni pesanti
ja: チャップス
nl: Beenkappen
no: Skinnbukser
pl: Skórzane spodnie kowbojskie
pt: Chaparejos
ru: Краги
sv: Chaps
tr: Kovboy Pantolonları

en: Coats & Jackets
xx: Coats & Jackets
cs: Kabáty a bundy
da: Frakker og jakker
de: Mäntel & Jacken
es: Chaquetas y abrigos
fr: Manteaux et vestes
it: Cappotti e giacche
ja: コート・ジャケット
nl: Jassen en jacks
no: Frakker og jakker
pl: Płaszcze i kurtki
pt: Casacos e jaquetas
ru: Пальто и куртки
sv: Kappor och jackor
tr: Montlar ve Ceketler

en: Leather jackets
fr: Blouson en cuir

en: Coat
fr: Manteau

en: Anoraks
xx: Anoraks
fr: Anoraks, Anorak

en: Down Jackets
fr: Doudounes, Doudoune

en: Duffle Coats
fr: Duffle-coats, Duffle-coat

en: Pea Coats
fr: Cabans, Caban

en: Trench Coats
xx: Trench Coats
fr: Trench-coats, Trench